data/grammar/fst/suffixes-generated.lexc
! Generated by data/grammar/fst/generate_affixes.py -- DO NOT HAND-EDIT.
! Rerun that script to regenerate after the source CSVs change.
! See its module docstring for exactly which rows/action codes are
! included/excluded. Reached from lexicon.lexc's NounContinuations/
! VerbContinuations/QParticles -- see those LEXICON blocks.
!
! *Speculative* blocks (see SPECULATIVE_LEXICON_SUFFIX in this
! script): entries wired WITHOUT respecting their own CSV row's
! condition column (case/mode/number/nature/transitivity/
! antipassive/an id: trigger this project has no dedicated branch
! for) -- there is no gold-standard word left to verify these
! against (the --fair gold standard was fully resolved before this
! pass), so treat every entry in a *Speculative* block as an
! UNVERIFIED GUESS, not a confirmed fact, unlike every other entry
! in this whole lexicon. Added per Alain's explicit direction
! (2026-08-21-ish session): the worst case is a missing candidate
! for some word outside the current gold sample (same as before
! this pass), not a corruption of an existing correct reading --
! confirmed zero regressions on the full gold standard before
! committing. If a real problem ever traces back to one of these
! specific entries, that's the signal to fix or remove it, not
! evidence the whole approach was wrong.

Multichar_Symbols +1nn +1nv +1q +1vn +1vv +2nn +2nv +2vn +2vv +3nn +3nv +3vn +3vv +4nv +4vv

LEXICON AfterAblCaseEnding
++ngaaq+1nv:NASALngaaq # ;
++ngaaq+1nv:NASALngaaq VerbContinuations ;
++nngaq+1nv:NASALnngaq # ;
++nngaq+1nv:NASALnngaq VerbContinuations ;

LEXICON AfterApIRoot
++i+1vv:i # ;
++i+1vv:i VerbContinuations ;
++i+1vv:SUPPRi # ;
++i+1vv:SUPPRi VerbContinuations ;

LEXICON AfterApJiRoot
++ji+1vv:ji # ;
++ji+1vv:ji VerbContinuations ;

LEXICON AfterApKsiRoot
++ksi+1vv:ksi # ;
++ksi+1vv:ksi VerbContinuations ;

LEXICON AfterApNnikRoot
++nnik+1vv:nnik # ;
++nnik+1vv:nnik VerbContinuations ;
++nnik+1vv:SUPPRnnik # ;
++nnik+1vv:SUPPRnnik VerbContinuations ;

LEXICON AfterApRiRoot
++ri+1vv:SUPPRri # ;
++ri+1vv:SUPPRri VerbContinuations ;

LEXICON AfterApSiRoot
++si+1vv:si # ;
++si+1vv:si VerbContinuations ;

LEXICON AfterDatCaseEnding
++aq+1nv:SUPPRaq # ;
++aq+1nv:SUPPRaq VerbContinuations ;
++ngau+1nv:NASALngau # ;
++ngau+1nv:NASALngau VerbContinuations ;
++uq+3nv:SUPPRuq # ;
++uq+3nv:SUPPRuq VerbContinuations ;

LEXICON AfterIntransGusukRoot
++gusuk+1vv:gusuk # ;
++gusuk+1vv:gusuk VerbContinuations ;
++gusuk+1vv:SUPPRgusuk # ;
++gusuk+1vv:SUPPRgusuk VerbContinuations ;
++gusuk+1vv:SUPPRrusuk # ;
++gusuk+1vv:SUPPRrusuk VerbContinuations ;

LEXICON AfterIntransKsaqRoot
++ksaq+1vv:ksaq # ;
++ksaq+1vv:ksaq VerbContinuations ;
++ksaq+1vv:SUPPRksaq # ;
++ksaq+1vv:SUPPRksaq VerbContinuations ;

LEXICON AfterIntransSi3vvRoot
++si+3vv:si # ;
++si+3vv:si VerbContinuations ;

LEXICON AfterIntransSukRoot
++suk+1vv:suk # ;
++suk+1vv:suk VerbContinuations ;
++suk+1vv:SUPPRsuk # ;
++suk+1vv:SUPPRsuk VerbContinuations ;

LEXICON AfterItTriggerSuffix
++li+4vv:SUPPRli # ;
++li+4vv:SUPPRli VerbContinuations ;
++li+4vv:VOICEli # ;
++li+4vv:VOICEli VerbContinuations ;

LEXICON AfterJuqTriggerSuffix
++paaluk+1vn:paaluk # ;
++paaluk+1vn:paaluk NounContinuations ;
++uti+3nn:SUPPRuti # ;
++uti+3nn:SUPPRuti NounContinuations ;

LEXICON AfterLocCaseEnding
++it+1nv:it # ;
++it+1nv:it VerbContinuations ;

LEXICON AfterNatureARoot
++gi+3vv:gi # ;
++gi+3vv:gi VerbContinuations ;
++gi+3vv:SUPPRgi # ;
++gi+3vv:SUPPRgi VerbContinuations ;
++gi+3vv:SUPPRri # ;
++gi+3vv:SUPPRri VerbContinuations ;
++it+1vv:it # ;
++it+1vv:it VerbContinuations ;
++it+1vv:SUPPRit # ;
++it+1vv:SUPPRit VerbContinuations ;
++ksaq+2vv:ksaq # ;
++ksaq+2vv:ksaq VerbContinuations ;
++ksaq+2vv:SUPPRksaq # ;
++ksaq+2vv:SUPPRksaq VerbContinuations ;

LEXICON AfterNatureNbRoot
++iqsuq+1nv:iqsuq # ;
++iqsuq+1nv:iqsuq VerbContinuations ;
++iqsuq+1nv:SUPPRiqsuq # ;
++iqsuq+1nv:SUPPRiqsuq VerbContinuations ;

LEXICON AfterSimCaseEnding
++it+1nv:it # ;
++it+1nv:it VerbContinuations ;
++uq+2nv:SUPPRuq # ;
++uq+2nv:SUPPRuq VerbContinuations ;

LEXICON AfterTransGi4vvRoot
++gi+4vv:gi # ;
++gi+4vv:gi VerbContinuations ;
++gi+4vv:SUPPRgi # ;
++gi+4vv:SUPPRgi VerbContinuations ;
++gi+4vv:SUPPRri # ;
++gi+4vv:SUPPRri VerbContinuations ;

LEXICON AfterTypeVRoot
++a+1vv:SUPPRa # ;
++a+1vv:SUPPRa VerbContinuations ;
++a+1vv:SUPPRa AfterApKsiRoot ;
++a+1vv:SUPPRa AfterApRiRoot ;
++a+1vv:SUPPRaq # ;
++a+1vv:SUPPRaq VerbContinuations ;
++a+1vv:SUPPRaq AfterApKsiRoot ;
++a+1vv:SUPPRaq AfterApRiRoot ;
++t+1vv:t # ;
++t+1vv:t VerbContinuations ;
++t+1vv:t AfterApSiRoot ;
++t+1vv:KGUARDt # ;
++t+1vv:KGUARDt VerbContinuations ;
++t+1vv:KGUARDt AfterApSiRoot ;

LEXICON AfterUTriggerSuffix
++jaq+3vn:jaq # ;
++jaq+3vn:jaq NounContinuations ;
++jaq+1vv:jaaq # ;
++jaq+1vv:jaaq VerbContinuations ;

LEXICON AfterViaCaseEnding
++uq+1nv:SUPPRuq # ;
++uq+1nv:SUPPRuq VerbContinuations ;
